Hawaii, session 2025, HB1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 159, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§159-     Further exemptions; food donations; wild game.  (a)  This chapter shall not apply to the slaughtering of wild game or the transportation or custom preparation of the carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products of wild game at establishments conducting these operations if the articles are wild game exclusively to be donated by a hunter for the use or distribution by a charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization to needy persons pursuant to chapter 145D; provided that the wild game shall not be combined with a meat food product regulated under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, title 21 United States Code section 601 et seq., or a poultry product regulated under the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, title 21 United States Code section 451 et seq.; provided further that the transportation of wild game shall be limited to moving the wild game to and from the premises where the hunter killed the wild game, the processing establishment, and the charitable, religious, or nonprofit organization. (b) For the purposes of this section, "wild game" means a member of a species of game not indigenous to the State, including axis deer, that is used for food, that is not domesticated, and that is harvested in the wild.  "Wild game" includes the carcasses, parts thereof, and meat or meat products derived from wild game." SECTION 2.  Section 145D-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§145D-5[]] Reserving the State's authority to regulate, inspect, or ban the use of donated food.  Nothing in this chapter or section 159-    is intended to restrict the authority of the department of health or the department of agriculture to regulate, inspect, or ban the use of [such] donated foods for human consumption." SECTION 3.  Section 159-29, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows: "(c) The transportation by commercial carrier of carcasses, parts thereof, or meat or meat products produced without inspection under subsection (a) [is] shall be prohibited, except under permit issued by the board[.] and under section 159-   ." SECTION 4.  Section 159-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) [The] Except as provided in 159-   , the preparation, sale, offering for sale, or transportation or receipt for transportation in intrastate commerce of meat and meat products derived from exotic animals, unless inspected and passed as provided for under this part, [is] shall be prohibited.  Violators shall be subject to all requirements and penalties of this chapter." SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on December 31, 2050.